District of Columbia statutes.
29A-1065

Repealed

Two-year registration fees to be paid by domestic and foreign limited liability companies.

Repealed.

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 66, 41 DCR 3010
June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-133, § 2(h), 47 DCR 2686
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 1605(c), 49 DCR 11664
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(s), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-1065.
1981 Ed., § 29-1365.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1605(c) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1605(c) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1605(c) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).